Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 7. Operators of Motor Vehicles

§ 891.
Commissioner of Motor Vehicles as process agent.

The acceptance by a person of the rights and privileges conferred upon him or her by Titles 19 and 23, as evidenced by his or her operating, or causing to be operated, a motor vehicle in this State shall be deemed equivalent to an appointment by such person of the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, or his or her successor in office, to be his or her true and lawful attorney upon whom may be served all lawful processes in any action or proceeding against such person or his or her estate if he or she is deceased at the time when the suit is brought, growing out of any accident or collision in which such person may be involved while operating or causing to be operated a motor vehicle in this State.
Such acceptance shall be deemed to be the agreement of such person that any process against him or her which is so served upon the Commissioner shall be of the same legal force and validity as if served on the person personally.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 88

, § 1, eff. April 18, 1969.

§ 892.
Service on Commissioner; mailing copies; fees.

Service of process shall be made by leaving a copy of the process with a fee of $15.00 with the Commissioner, or in his or her office. Service shall be sufficient upon the person, provided that a copy of the process with the officer’s return on it, showing service upon the Commissioner as provided in this section, is sent by the plaintiff to the defendant, or the personal representative of his or her estate, by registered or certified mail, and provided further that the plaintiff’s affidavit of compliance is filed with the process in court. The Commissioner shall file copies served upon him or her as provided in this section, and show upon each copy the day and hour of service.

Such manner of service shall be in addition to all existing manner of service, rights, and remedies, and the availability of such manner of service shall not make the provisions of section 552 of this title inoperative, relative to tolling of the statute of limitations.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 134

;

1969, No. 88

, § 2, eff. April 18, 1969;

1989, No. 51

, § 6;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 15, 2002;

2003, No. 101

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 893.
Continuances; costs.

The court in which the action is pending may order such continuances as may be necessary to afford the defendant reasonable opportunity to defend the same.
The fee herein provided shall be taxed in the plaintiff’s costs, if he or she prevails in the suit.